Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-264
Withdrawal of general partner.

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement, including to the extent stated in the partnership agreement a forfeiture of the withdrawing general partner's partnership interest, and may offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to him or her in addition to any remedies available under applicable law.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 32;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 38.